Hawaii statutes.
[§431:3D-110] Severability. If any provision
of this article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid,
that determination shall not affect the provisions or applications of this
article that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and
to that end, the provisions of this article are severable. [L 2016, c 140, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next